Missouri, session 2026, HB2431.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.578, 67.1000, 67.1360, 67.1367, 94.815, and 94.900, RSMo,
are repealed and twelve new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.578,
67.599, 67.1000, 67.1013, 67.1190, 67.1360, 67.1367, 94.451, 94.456, 94.815, 94.833, and
94.900, to read as follows:
67.578. 1. The governing authority of any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than sixteen thousand four hundred but less than
sixteen thousand five hundred inhabitants and any county with more than nineteen
thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eight thousand five hundred but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants may
impose a sales tax in an amount not to exceed one-fifth of one percent on all retail sales made
in the county which are subject to taxation pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525, to be used
solely for the funding of museums. For purposes of this section, the term "museums" means
museums operating in the county, which are registered with the United States Internal
Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) corporation and which are considered by the board to be a
tourism attraction. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other
sales taxes allowed by law, except that no sales tax shall be imposed pursuant to this section
unless the governing authority submits to the voters of the county, at a county or state general,
primary, or special election, a proposal to authorize the governing authority to impose the tax.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2431 2
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (insert the name of the county) impose a
sales tax of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the funding of
museums? "Museums" means museums operating in the county, which
are registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service as a 501
(c)(3) corporation and which are considered by the museum board to be
a tourism attraction.
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the sales tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the tax. If the
proposal receives less than the required majority of votes, then the governing authority shall
have no power to impose the tax unless and until the governing authority has again submitted
another proposal to authorize the governing authority to impose the sales tax authorized by
this section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon.
3. On or after the effective date of the tax, the director of revenue shall be responsible
for the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply. The director may retain an amount not to exceed one percent for
deposit in the general revenue fund to offset the costs of collection. In order to permit sellers
required to collect and report the sales tax to collect the amount required to be reported and
remitted, but not to change the requirements of reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a
levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of pennies, the governing authority may
authorize the use of a bracket system similar to that authorized in section 144.285, and
notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this new bracket system shall be used where
this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable transactions. Beginning with the effective
date of the tax, every retailer in the county shall add the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax
shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer until paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the
same manner as the purchase price. For purposes of this section, all retail sales shall be
deemed to be consummated at the place of business of the retailer.
4. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of

HCS HB 2431 3
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons
pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts
allowed the retailer pursuant to the state sales tax law for the collection of and for payment of
taxes are hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations
provided in section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to
violations of this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required
to be paid pursuant to this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the
person for taxes and penalty pursuant to this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the
collection of the delinquent tax and penalty shall be the same as that provided in sections
144.010 to 144.525.
5. The governing authority may authorize any museum board already existing in the
county, or may establish a museum board, to expend revenue collected pursuant to this
section. In the event that no museum board already exists, the board established pursuant to
this section shall consist of six members who are appointed by the governing authority from a
list of candidates supplied by the chair of each of the two major political parties of the county,
with three members from each of the two parties. Members shall serve for three-year terms,
but of the members first appointed, one shall be appointed for a term of one year, two shall be
appointed for a term of two years, and two shall be appointed for a term of three years. Each
member shall be a resident of the county. The members shall not receive compensation for
service on the board, but shall be reimbursed from the revenues collected pursuant to this
section for any reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in service on the board. The
board shall determine in what manner the revenues will be expended, and disbursements of
these moneys shall be made strictly in accordance with this section. Expenditures may be
made for the employment of personnel selected by the board to assist in carrying out the
duties of the board, and the board is expressly authorized to employ such personnel.
6. The governing authority may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters
at any county or state general, primary, or special election. The ballot of submission shall
contain, but need not be limited to, the following language:
Shall the county of ______ (insert name of county) repeal the sales tax
of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the funding of museums?
YES NO

HCS HB 2431 4
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which the repeal was approved.
67.599. 1. The governing body of a county with more than nine thousand nine
hundred but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than one thousand but fewer than one thousand five hundred inhabitants may adopt an
order or ordinance imposing a sales tax on all retail sales made within the county that
are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The rate of such tax may be imposed in
increments of one-eighth of one percent but shall not exceed one percent.
2. Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the county, on any date available for elections for the county, a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose such tax. Such tax
shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed by law. Such tax shall be stated separately
from all other charges and taxes. The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the county
solely for the purpose of providing funding for county facilities including, but not
limited to, the operation and maintenance of county facilities.
3. (1) The ballot of submission for such tax shall contain, but need not be limited
to, the following language: "Shall ______ (insert the county name) impose a sales tax at
a rate of _______ (insert percentage) percent for the purpose of providing funding for
county facilities?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, such tax shall become effective on the first day of
the second calendar quarter immediately following notification to the state department
of revenue. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the question, such tax shall not become effective unless and until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the county and
such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the county voting on
the question.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
5. (1) All moneys collected under this section by the director of the department
of revenue on behalf of such county, less one percent for cost of collection, which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety

HCS HB 2431 5
bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created and shall be known as the "County Facilities Sales Tax Fund". Moneys
in the fund shall not be deemed to be state moneys and shall not be commingled with
any moneys of the state. The director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund
and credited to the county for erroneous payments and overpayments made and may
redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such county.
(2) Any moneys in the special fund that are not needed for current expenditures
shall be invested in the same manner as other moneys are invested. Any interest and
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the
district that levied the tax. Moneys in the fund shall be used solely for the designated
purposes.
6. The governing body of a county that has adopted such tax may submit the
question of repeal of the tax to the voters on any date available for elections for the
county. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-
first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal,
such tax shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting
on the question.
7. If such tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all moneys remaining in
the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. The
county shall notify the director of the state department of revenue of the repeal or
termination at least ninety days before the effective date of the repeal or termination.
The director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two
percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
overpayments of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the
credit of such account. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of the repeal
or termination, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the county and
close the account of that county. The director shall notify such county of each instance
of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
67.1000. 1. The governing body of the following cities and counties may impose a
tax as provided in this section:
(1) Any county;

HCS HB 2431 6
(2) Any city which is the county seat of any county or which now or hereafter has a
population of more than three thousand five hundred inhabitants and which has heretofore
been authorized by the general assembly;
(3) Any city or county with more than three hundred fifty hotel and motel rooms
within the boundaries of such city or county;
(4) Any other city which has a population of more than eighteen thousand and less
than forty-five thousand inhabitants located in a county of the first classification with a
population over two hundred thousand adjacent to a county of the first classification with a
population over nine hundred thousand.
2. The governing body of any city or county listed in subsection 1 of this section may
impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or
motels situated in the city or county, which shall be not more than five percent per occupied
room per night, except that such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of
the city or county submits to the voters of the city or county at an election permitted under
section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city or county to impose a
tax under the provisions of this section and section 67.1002. The tax authorized by this
section and section 67.1002 shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall
be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used
by the city or county solely for funding a convention and visitors bureau which shall be a
general not-for-profit organization with whom the city or county has contracted, and which is
established for the purpose of promoting the city or county as a convention, visitor and tourist
center. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
3. As used in this section and section 67.1002, the term "transient guests" means a
person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less
during any calendar quarter, except that in any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than forty-one thousand one hundred but fewer
than forty-one thousand two hundred inhabitants, "transient guests" means a person or
persons who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or motel for ninety days or less during any
calendar quarter.
4. Provisions of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing body of
any home rule city with more than thirty-nine thousand six hundred but fewer than thirty-nine
thousand seven hundred inhabitants and partially located in any county of the first
classification with more than seventy-one thousand three hundred but fewer than seventy-one
thousand four hundred inhabitants may impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms
paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city, which shall be not more
than seven percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not become
effective unless the governing body of such city submits to the voters of the city at an election

HCS HB 2431 7
permitted under section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to
impose a tax under the provisions of this subsection and section 67.1002. The tax authorized
by this subsection and section 67.1002 shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room
and shall be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall
be used by the city solely for funding a convention and visitors bureau which shall be a
general not-for-profit organization with whom the city has contracted, and which is
established for the purpose of promoting the city as a convention, visitor, and tourist center.
Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
5. (1) This subsection shall apply in any city with more than fifty-one thousand
but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the
governing body of a city described in subdivision (1) of this subsection that imposes a
tax under this section as of the effective date of this section may increase the percentage
of the tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or
motels situated in the city.
(3) Such increase in the percentage shall not result in the total percentage of the
tax imposed under this section exceeding six percent per occupied room per night.
(4) Such increase in the percentage shall not become effective unless the
governing body of such city submits to the voters of the city at an election permitted
under section 115.123 a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to increase
the percentage of the tax under the provisions of this subsection and section 67.1002.
(5) Such increase authorized by this subsection and section 67.1002 shall be in
addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to any and all taxes
imposed by law. Such increase shall be stated separately from all other charges and
taxes.
(6) The proceeds derived from an increase approved by the voters after the
effective date of this section shall be used by the city solely to provide moneys for the
construction and maintenance of new capital projects to promote tourism in such city.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the tax authorized in
this section shall not be imposed by the following cities or counties:
(1) Any city or county already imposing a tax solely on the charges for sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in any such city or county
under any other law of this state;
(2) Any city not already imposing a tax under this section and that is located in whole
or partially within a county that already imposes a tax solely on the charges for sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in such county under this
section or any other law of this state; or

HCS HB 2431 8
(3) Any county not already imposing a tax under this section and that has a city
located in whole or in part within its boundaries that already imposes a tax solely on the
charges for sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in such
city under this section or any other law of this state.
[6.] 7. This section shall not be construed as repealing any taxes levied by any city or
county on transient guests as permitted under this chapter or chapter 94 as of August 28,
2011.
67.1013. 1. The governing body of any city with more than ten thousand but
fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants
may impose a tax as provided in this section.
2. The governing body of any city described in subsection 1 of this section may
impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels
or motels situated in the city or a portion thereof, which shall be not more than six
percent per occupied room per night. Such tax shall not become effective unless the
governing body of the city submits to the voters of the city at a state, municipal, general,
or primary election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose the
tax under this section. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to the
charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to any and all other taxes. Such
tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
3. (1) The question submitted for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels situated
in ______ (insert city name) at a rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the city voting on the question.
4. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who
occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any
calendar quarter.
67.1190. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Campground" or "campsite", real property, other than state-owned
property, that contains parcels for rent to transient guests for pay or compensation, that

HCS HB 2431 9
may include temporary utility hook-ups for use by the transient guests, and where such
transient guests generally use tents, recreational vehicles, or some other form of
temporary shelter while on the rented premises, including recreational vehicles parks;
(2) "County", a county with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four hundred eighty but
fewer than one thousand inhabitants;
(3) "Transient guest", a person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a
hotel, motel, or resort for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter;
(4) "Watercraft", any canoe, kayak, raft, or tube, as such terms are defined
under section 537.327, propelled by the use of paddles, oars, hands, poles, or other
nonmechanical, nonmotorized means of propulsion.
2. (1) The governing body of a county may impose, by order or ordinance, a
surcharge tax on watercraft rentals and on the charges for all sleeping rooms, guest
rooms, cabins, or campsites, or other transient guest accommodations paid by transient
guests of hotels, motels, campgrounds, resorts, bed and breakfast inns, tourist courts,
short-term residential dwelling rentals, or other transient accommodations or lodging
establishments situated within the county or a portion thereof.
(2) The surcharge authorized under this section shall be:
(a) Equal to five percent of the costs of such rentals;
(b) In addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to any
and all other taxes; and
(c) Stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such surcharge tax shall be used by the county for general
revenue purposes.
3. (1) Such surcharge shall not become effective unless the governing body of the
county submits to the voters of the county, at any election available for the county, a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the surcharge under
this section.
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, the surcharge shall become effective on the first day
of the second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was
held. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the proposal, the tax shall not become effective unless and until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. (1) Every retailer, vendor, operator, and other person who sells goods and
services subject to the surcharge imposed under this section shall be liable and

HCS HB 2431 10
responsible for the payment of surcharges due and shall make a return and remit such
surcharges to the county, at such times and in such manner as the governing body of the
county shall prescribe. The collection of the surcharges imposed by this section shall be
computed in accordance with schedules or systems approved by the governing body of
the county.
(2) An intermediary platform that facilitates the rental of a short-term
residential dwelling rental to and collects payment from a transient guest, may enter
into an agreement with the department of revenue and the county to collect and remit
the surcharge tax authorized under this section, subject to the provisions of sections
32.085 to 32.087, sections 136.010 to 136.380, and sections 144.010 to 144.525 and any
provisions or rules promulgated by the department and the county for the enforcement
of this section.
67.1360. 1. The governing body of the following cities and counties may impose a
tax as provided in this section:
(1) A city with a population of more than seven thousand and less than seven
thousand five hundred;
(2) A county with a population of over nine thousand six hundred and less than
twelve thousand which has a total assessed valuation of at least sixty-three million dollars, if
the county submits the issue to the voters of such county prior to January 1, 2003;
(3) A third class city which is the county seat of a county of the third classification
without a township form of government with a population of at least twenty-five thousand but
not more than thirty thousand inhabitants;
(4) Any fourth class city having, according to the last federal decennial census, a
population of more than one thousand eight hundred fifty inhabitants but less than one
thousand nine hundred fifty inhabitants in a county of the first classification with a charter
form of government and having a population of greater than six hundred thousand but less
than nine hundred thousand inhabitants;
(5) Any city having a population of more than three thousand but less than eight
thousand inhabitants in a county of the fourth classification having a population of greater
than forty-eight thousand inhabitants;
(6) Any city having a population of less than two hundred fifty inhabitants in a county
of the fourth classification having a population of greater than forty-eight thousand
inhabitants;
(7) Any fourth class city having a population of more than two thousand five hundred
but less than three thousand inhabitants in a county of the third classification having a
population of more than twenty-five thousand but less than twenty-seven thousand
inhabitants;

HCS HB 2431 11
(8) Any third class city with a population of more than three thousand two hundred
but less than three thousand three hundred located in a county of the third classification
having a population of more than thirty-five thousand but less than thirty-six thousand;
(9) Any county of the second classification without a township form of government
and a population of less than thirty thousand;
(10) Any city of the fourth class in a county of the second classification without a
township form of government and a population of less than thirty thousand;
(11) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and a
population of at least twenty-eight thousand but not more than thirty thousand;
(12) Any city of the fourth class with a population of more than one thousand eight
hundred but less than two thousand in a county of the third classification with a township
form of government and a population of at least twenty-eight thousand but not more than
thirty thousand;
(13) Any city of the third class with a population of more than seven thousand two
hundred but less than seven thousand five hundred within a county of the third classification
with a population of more than twenty-one thousand but less than twenty-three thousand;
(14) Any fourth class city having a population of more than two thousand eight
hundred but less than three thousand one hundred inhabitants in a county of the third
classification with a township form of government having a population of more than eight
thousand four hundred but less than nine thousand inhabitants;
(15) Any fourth class city with a population of more than four hundred seventy but
less than five hundred twenty inhabitants located in a county of the third classification with a
population of more than fifteen thousand nine hundred but less than sixteen thousand
inhabitants;
(16) Any third class city with a population of more than three thousand eight hundred
but less than four thousand inhabitants located in a county of the third classification with a
population of more than fifteen thousand nine hundred but less than sixteen thousand
inhabitants;
(17) Any fourth class city with a population of more than four thousand three hundred
but less than four thousand five hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification without a township form of government with a population greater than sixteen
thousand but less than sixteen thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(18) Any fourth class city with a population of more than two thousand four hundred
but less than two thousand six hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government with a population of more than fifty-five
thousand but less than sixty thousand inhabitants;

HCS HB 2431 12
(19) Any fourth class city with a population of more than two thousand five hundred
but less than two thousand six hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification with a population of more than nineteen thousand one hundred but less than
nineteen thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(20) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
with a population greater than sixteen thousand but less than sixteen thousand two hundred
inhabitants;
(21) Any county of the second classification with a population of more than forty-
four thousand but less than fifty thousand inhabitants;
(22) Any third class city with a population of more than nine thousand five hundred
but less than nine thousand seven hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government and with a population of more than one
hundred ninety-eight thousand but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two hundred
inhabitants;
(23) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand two hundred
but less than five thousand three hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than twenty-four
thousand five hundred but less than twenty-four thousand six hundred inhabitants;
(24) Any third class city with a population of more than nineteen thousand nine
hundred but less than twenty thousand in a county of the first classification without a charter
form of government and with a population of more than one hundred ninety-eight thousand
but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(25) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand six hundred
but less than two thousand seven hundred inhabitants located in any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than fifteen thousand
three hundred but less than fifteen thousand four hundred inhabitants;
(26) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
and with more than fourteen thousand nine hundred but less than fifteen thousand inhabitants;
(27) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand four hundred
but fewer than five thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(28) Any city of the fourth classification with more than six thousand three hundred
but fewer than six thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county
through the creation of a tourism district which may include, in addition to the geographic
area of such city, the area encompassed by the portion of the school district, located within a
county of the first classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but
fewer than ninety-three thousand nine hundred inhabitants, having an average daily

HCS HB 2431 13
attendance for school year 2005-06 between one thousand eight hundred and one thousand
nine hundred;
100 (29) Any city of the fourth classification with more than seven thousand seven
101 hundred but less than seven thousand eight hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
102 classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but less than ninety-three
103 thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
104 (30) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand nine hundred
105 but less than three thousand inhabitants located in a county of the first classification with
106 more than seventy-three thousand seven hundred but less than seventy-three thousand eight
107 hundred inhabitants;
108 (31) Any city of the third classification with more than nine thousand three hundred
109 but less than nine thousand four hundred inhabitants;
110 (32) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand eight hundred
111 but fewer than three thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first
112 classification with more than thirty-nine thousand seven hundred but fewer than thirty-nine
113 thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
114 (33) Any city of the fourth classification with more than one thousand eight hundred
115 but fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first
116 classification with more than one hundred thirty-five thousand four hundred but fewer than
117 one hundred thirty-five thousand five hundred inhabitants;
118 (34) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
119 and with more than twelve thousand one hundred but fewer than twelve thousand two
120 hundred inhabitants;
121 (35) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand eight hundred
122 but fewer than four thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county; provided,
123 however, that motels owned by not-for-profit organizations are exempt;
124 (36) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand but fewer than
125 five thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in any county with a charter form of
126 government and with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than three hundred fifty
127 thousand inhabitants; [or]
128 (37) Any city with more than four thousand but fewer than five thousand five hundred
129 inhabitants and located in any county of the fourth classification with more than thirty
130 thousand but fewer than forty-two thousand inhabitants;
131 (38) Any city with more than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four
132 thousand nine hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
133 than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants; or

HCS HB 2431 14
134 (39) Any city with more than five thousand six hundred but fewer than six
135 thousand three hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
136 than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants.
137 2. The governing body of any city or county listed in subsection 1 of this section may
138 impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels,
139 motels, bed and breakfast inns, and campgrounds and any docking facility that rents slips to
140 recreational boats that are used by transients for sleeping, which shall be at least two percent
141 but not more than five percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not
142 become effective unless the governing body of the city or county submits to the voters of the
143 city or county at a state general, primary, or special election, a proposal to authorize the
144 governing body of the city or county to impose a tax pursuant to the provisions of this section
145 and section 67.1362. The tax authorized by this section and section 67.1362 shall be in
146 addition to any charge paid to the owner or operator and shall be in addition to any and all
147 taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city or county solely
148 for funding the promotion of tourism. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other
149 charges and taxes.
67.1367. 1. (1) The governing body of the following counties may impose a tax as
provided in this section:
(a) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the fourth classification with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(b) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than
nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
than five thousand fifty inhabitants; [or]
(c) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than
nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than ten thousand inhabitants; or
(d) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand three
hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants.
(2) The governing body of any county listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection may
impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels,
motels, bed and breakfast inns, or campground cabins situated in the county or a portion
thereof, which shall be no more than six percent per occupied room or cabin per night, except
that such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county submits to
the voters of the county at a state general or primary election, a proposal to authorize the

HCS HB 2431 15
governing body of the county to impose a tax pursuant to this section. The tax authorized by
this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to
any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the county
solely for the promotion of tourism. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges
and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the county) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of
hotels, motels, bed and breakfast inns, and campground cabins
situated in ______ (name of county) at a rate of ______ (insert
rate of percent) percent for the sole purpose of promoting
tourism?
YES NO
3. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast [inns] inn, [and] or campground [cabins]
cabin for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
4. Any county that imposed a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the
transient guests of hotels and motels under this section before August 28, 2025, may impose
such tax upon the charges for all sleeping rooms or cabins paid by the transient guests of bed
and breakfast inns and campgrounds under this section without requiring a separate vote
authorizing the imposition of such tax upon such charges for such bed and breakfast inns and
campgrounds.
94.451. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Campground", real property:
(a) That contains parcels for rent to transient guests for pay or compensation;
(b) That may include temporary utility hook-ups for use by the transient guests;
and
(c) Where such transient guests generally use tents, recreational vehicles, or
some other form of temporary shelter while on the rented premises;
(2) "Transient guests", individuals who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or
motel or a campground site for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
2. (1) The governing body of a city with more than two thousand seven hundred
but fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty
thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand inhabitants may impose a

HCS HB 2431 16
tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms or campground sites paid by the transient
guests of hotels, motels, or campgrounds situated in the city or a portion thereof.
(2) Such tax shall be not more than five percent per occupied room or
campground site per night. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to the
charge for the sleeping room or campground site and all other taxes imposed by law.
Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for general revenue
purposes.
3. (1) Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the city
submits to the voters of the city at a state general or primary election a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section.
(2) The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a
tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms or campground sites paid by the transient
guests of hotels or motels or campgrounds situated in ______ (name of city) at a rate of _
_____ (insert rate of percent) percent for general revenue purposes?".
(3) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax authorized by this section shall not become effective
unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of
the city and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the city
voting on the question.
94.456. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "City":
(a) A city with more than thirty-three thousand but fewer than thirty-six
thousand five hundred inhabitants; or
(b) A city with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than sixty thousand but fewer than
seventy thousand inhabitants;
(2) "Transient guests", a person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a
hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
2. (1) The governing body of a city may impose a tax on the charges for all
sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city or a
portion thereof.
(2) Such tax shall:

HCS HB 2431 17
(a) For a city described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
section, not exceed eight percent per occupied room per night;
(b) For a city described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
section, not exceed five percent per occupied room per night;
(c) Be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to
any and all other taxes; and
(d) Be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) For a city described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
section, the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for general revenue purposes.
For a city described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section,
the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for promotion of tourism and related
economic development purposes.
(4) Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the city, at any election available for the city, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose the tax under this section.
3. (1) The question submitted for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels situated
in ______ (insert city name) at a rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent, the proceeds
of which shall be used for promotion of tourism and related economic development
purposes?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
94.815. 1. All taxes authorized and collected under sections 94.800 to 94.825 shall be
deposited by the municipality in a special trust fund to be known as the "Tourism Tax Trust
Fund". The moneys in such tourism tax trust fund shall not be commingled with any funds of
the municipality.
2. (1) Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, seventy-five percent of the
taxes collected shall be deposited in an "Infrastructure Account" within the tourism tax trust
fund and shall be used, upon appropriation by the municipality, solely for the purpose of
constructing and maintaining tourism infrastructure facilities and infrastructure
improvements[, to include] including, but not limited to, sidewalks, streets, highways,

HCS HB 2431 18
roads, waterworks, wastewater including distribution and collection systems and solid waste
disposal facilities, the costs of which may be funded by issuing bonds which may be retired
by revenues received from tourism taxes imposed pursuant to sections 94.802 and 94.805 or
the retirement of debt under previously voter-approved bonded indebtedness and the costs of
operation and maintenance of such infrastructure improvements. In addition to the
provisions of this subsection, the funds in the infrastructure account may be used for the
purpose of constructing and maintaining structures, trails, and other facilities for the
purpose of promoting tourism including, but not limited to, an indoor sports facility, the
costs of which may be funded by issuing bonds as provided herein.
(2) As used in this subsection, "tourism infrastructure facilities" means
structures, fixtures, systems, and facilities of a multipurpose sports and entertainment
venue with a seating capacity of fewer than twenty-five thousand, including associated
parking facilities, that are owned or operated by any public body and that the
municipality determines are a contributing factor in the attraction of sports,
recreational, entertainment, or meeting activities, either professional or amateur,
commercial or private. Such structures, fixtures, systems, and facilities may include,
but are not limited to, foundations, roofs, interior and exterior walls or windows, floors,
steps, stairs, concourses, hallways, restrooms, event or meeting spaces, or other
hospitality-related areas, concession or food preparation areas, and services systems.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, if any outstanding
bonds have been issued or indebtedness has been incurred prior to or after September 15,
1997, for the purpose of constructing and maintaining infrastructure improvements, including
sidewalks, streets, highways, roads, parks, waterworks, wastewater including distribution
and collection systems and solid waste disposal facilities, then a portion of the seventy-five
percent of the collected taxes to be deposited in the infrastructure account pursuant to
subsection 2 of this section shall instead be deposited in a "Debt Retirement Account" within
the tourism tax trust fund. The portion of the seventy-five percent of collected taxes to be
deposited in the debt retirement account and the administration of such account shall be
pursuant to section 94.820.
4. Twenty-five percent of the taxes collected shall be deposited into a "Tourism
Promotion Account" within the tourism tax trust fund and shall be used, upon appropriation
by the municipality, for tourism marketing and promotional purposes.
5. The tourism taxes authorized by sections 94.802 and 94.805 shall be in addition to
any and all other taxes allowed by law, but no ordinance imposing a tax under sections 94.802
and 94.805 shall be effective unless the governing body of the municipality submits to the
voters of the municipality at an election permitted pursuant to section 115.123 a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the municipality to impose such tax and, if such tax is to be

HCS HB 2431 19
used to retire bonds authorized under this section, to authorize such bonds and their
retirement by such tax or charge or to authorize the retirement of debt under previously voter-
approved bonded indebtedness.
94.833. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "City", a city of the third classification that operates under the city manager
form of government established under chapter 78;
(2) "Lodging establishment", a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other
similar establishment offering similar lodging accommodations;
(3) "Lodging facility", a short-term rental of a house, condominium,
campground cabin, or other similar facility offering similar lodging accommodations;
(4) "Transient guests", individuals who, for thirty-one days or less during any
calendar quarter, occupy a room or rooms in a lodging establishment or occupy a
lodging facility.
2. (1) The governing body of a city may impose a tax on the charges for all
lodging establishment sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of lodging
establishments and on the charges for all lodging facilities paid by transient guests
who occupy such lodging facilities that are situated in the city or a portion thereof.
(2) Such tax shall:
(a) Not exceed five percent per occupied lodging establishment sleeping room
per night or five percent per rental term of such lodging facility;
(b) Be in addition to the charge for the lodging establishment sleeping room or
lodging facility and shall be in addition to any and all other taxes; and
(c) Be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for the promotion of
tourism.
(4) Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the city, at any election available for the city, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose the tax under this section.
3. (1) The question submitted for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms and on the charges for all short-term rentals paid by the
transient guests of lodging establishments and lodging facilities situated in ______
(insert city name) at a rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent, the proceeds of which
shall be used solely for the promotion of tourism?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.

HCS HB 2431 20
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. (1) On and after the effective date of any tax authorized in this section, the
city may adopt one of the two following provisions for the collection and administration
of the tax:
(a) The city may adopt rules and regulations for the internal collection of such
tax by the city officers usually responsible for collection and administration of city
taxes; or
(b) The city may enter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state
of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section.
(2) If a city adopts the internal collection of such tax under paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the city:
(a) Shall establish a fund for the deposit of all revenues derived from such tax,
from which the city may disburse moneys for the sole purpose of the promotion of
tourism through marketing, events, and constructing and maintaining tourism facilities;
and
(b) May collect a penalty of one percent and interest not to exceed two percent
per month on unpaid taxes that are deemed delinquent thirty days after the last day of
each quarter.
(3) If such city enters into an agreement under paragraph (b) of subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the director of revenue shall:
(a) Perform all functions incident to the administration, collection, enforcement,
and operation of such tax;
(b) Promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the forms and procedures
under which the tax authorized in this section shall be collected and reported;
(c) Collect the tax authorized in this section; and
(d) Retain an amount not to exceed one percent for cost of collection.
5. (1) After the initial bonds, if any, have been satisfied, the governing body of
such city may submit to the voters of the city, at any election available for the city, a
proposal to repeal the tax imposed under this section.
(2) The question submitted for such repeal shall be in substantially the following
form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) repeal the tax imposed on the charges for all
sleeping rooms and on the charges for all short-term rentals paid by the transient guests
of lodging establishments and lodging facilities situated in ______ (insert city name) at a
rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent for the promotion of tourism?".

HCS HB 2431 21
(3) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the repeal shall become effective on December
thirty-first of the calendar year in which such appeal was approved. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, the repeal shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this subsection to the qualified voters and such question is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
94.900. 1. (1) The governing body of the following cities may impose a tax as
provided in this section:
(a) Any city of the third classification with more than ten thousand eight hundred but
less than ten thousand nine hundred inhabitants located at least partly within a county of the
first classification with more than one hundred eighty-four thousand but less than one
hundred eighty-eight thousand inhabitants;
(b) Any city of the fourth classification with more than four thousand five hundred
but fewer than five thousand inhabitants;
(c) Any city of the fourth classification with more than eight thousand nine hundred
but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;
(d) Any home rule city with more than forty-eight thousand but fewer than forty-nine
thousand inhabitants;
(e) Any home rule city with more than seventy-three thousand but fewer than
seventy-five thousand inhabitants;
(f) Any city of the fourth classification with more than thirteen thousand five hundred
but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants;
(g) Any city of the fourth classification with more than seven thousand but fewer than
eight thousand inhabitants;
(h) Any city of the fourth classification with more than four thousand but fewer than
four thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first classification
with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants;
(i) Any city of the third classification with more than thirteen thousand but fewer than
fifteen thousand inhabitants and located in any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than thirty-three thousand but fewer than thirty-
seven thousand inhabitants;
(j) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand three hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty thousand inhabitants and that is not the county seat of such county;

HCS HB 2431 22
(k) Any city with more than ten thousand but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants
and partially located in a county with more than two hundred thirty thousand but fewer than
two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants;
(l) Any city with more than three thousand four hundred but fewer than three
thousand eight hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants;
(m) Any city with more than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than five thousand
six hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than
thirty-five thousand inhabitants;
[(m)] (n) Any city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than twenty-
two thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants;
[(n)] (o) Any village with more than four hundred thirty but fewer than four hundred
eighty inhabitants and partially located in a county with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants;
[(o)] (p) Any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county;
[(p)] (q) Any city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more than twenty-two thousand
but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine
hundred but fewer than one thousand four hundred inhabitants;
[(q)] (r) Any city with more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county;
[(r)] (s) Any city with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer
than twenty-two thousand inhabitants; [or
(s)] (t) Any city with more than one hundred sixty-five but fewer than one hundred
eighty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more than eleven thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four
thousand but fewer than five thousand inhabitants; [or
(t)] (u) Any city with more than two thousand one hundred fifty but fewer than two
thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than seven hundred
thousand but fewer than eight hundred thousand inhabitants;
(v) Any city with more than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants; or

HCS HB 2431 23
(w) Any city with more than five thousand six hundred but fewer than six
thousand three hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants.
(2) The governing body of any city listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection is
hereby authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount of up to one-half
of one percent on all retail sales made in such city which are subject to taxation under the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of improving the public safety for
such city, which shall be limited to expenditures on equipment, salaries and benefits, and
facilities for police, fire and emergency medical providers. The tax authorized by this section
shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or
order imposing a sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless
the governing body of the city submits to the voters of the city, at a county or state general,
primary or special election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a
tax.
2. If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the
following language:
Shall the city of _________ (city's name) impose a citywide sales
tax of _________ (insert amount) for the purpose of improving
the public safety of the city?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal submitted pursuant to this subsection, then the ordinance or order and
any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the second calendar quarter after
the director of revenue receives notification of adoption of the local sales tax. If a proposal
receives less than the required majority, then the governing body of the city shall have no
power to impose the sales tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the
city shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required
100 majority of the qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal
101 pursuant to this section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of
102 the last proposal pursuant to this section.

HCS HB 2431 24
103 3. All revenue received by a city from the tax authorized under the provisions of this
104 section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for improving the
105 public safety for such city for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
106 4. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
107 all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for improving the public
108 safety for the city. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for current
109 expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable laws
110 relating to the investment of other city funds.
111 5. All sales taxes collected by the director of the department of revenue under this
112 section on behalf of any city, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited
113 in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
114 section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
115 known as the "City Public Safety Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the trust fund shall
116 not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
117 provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in this fund shall not be
118 transferred and placed to the credit of the general revenue fund. The director of the
119 department of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust and
120 which was collected in each city imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and the records
121 shall be open to the inspection of officers of the city and the public. Not later than the tenth
122 day of each month the director of the department of revenue shall distribute all moneys
123 deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the city which levied the tax; such
124 funds shall be deposited with the city treasurer of each such city, and all expenditures of funds
125 arising from the trust fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing
126 body of each such city. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any functions
127 authorized in the ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the tax to the
128 voters.
129 6. The director of the department of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in
130 the trust fund and credited to any city for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and
131 may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such cities. If any city
132 abolishes the tax, the city shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at
133 least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of the department of
134 revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
135 amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
136 tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
137 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such city, the
138 director of the department of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the city and

HCS HB 2431 25
139 close the account of that city. The director of the department of revenue shall notify each city
140 of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
141 7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
142 shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
143 8. If any city in subsection 1 of this section enacts the tax authorized in this section,
144 the city shall budget an amount to public safety that is no less than the amount budgeted in the
145 year immediately preceding the enactment of the tax. The revenue from the tax shall
146 supplement and not replace amounts budgeted by the city.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to provide funding for public
safety, the repeal and reenactment of section 94.900 of this act is deemed necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and safety and is hereby declared
to be an emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and the repeal and reenactment
of section 94.900 of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✔